Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-380
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of sections 77-202.03 and 77-379 to 77-385 to provide a mechanism which will enable the Legislature to better determine those sectors of the economy which are receiving indirect subsidies as a result of tax expenditures. The Legislature recognizes that the present budgeting system fails to accurately and totally reflect the revenue lost due to such tax expenditures and that as a result undetermined amounts of potential revenue are escaping public or legislative scrutiny. The loss of such potential revenue causes a narrowing of the tax base which in turn forces higher tax rates on the remaining tax base.

Laws 1979, LB 17, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1979, § 77-354;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 21.